Utah statutes.
54-8-19.   Assessments -- Right to levy against property -- Due date --
Notice -- Payment in annual installments.
(1)  The governing body may levy the assessments under the assessment list in
whole or in part at any time after the adoption of the assessment resolution,
but if not levied as a whole, any partial levies shall be made on the basis of
completed improvements and the property benefited by the improvements.
(2)  The amount of the assessment will become due and collectible immediately
upon the levying of the assessment and, if it is not paid within 30 days from
the date of the levy, it shall, at the expiration of the 30 days, commence to
bear interest at a rate fixed by the governing body but not to exceed 7% per
annum.
(3) (a)  Notice shall be given in the same manner as provided in Section
54-8-16.
(b)  The notice under Subsection (3)(a) shall:
(i)  specify the date and amount of the levy affecting each tract, block, lot,
or parcel, the date when interest will commence, the amount of such interest,
and the period of years over which installment payments may be made;
(ii)  identify the easement that may be acquired by Subsection 54-8-26(2); and
(iii)  be recorded in the office of the recorder of the county in which the
tract, block, lot, or parcel is located.
(4) (a)  If the assessment is not paid within the 30 days allowed, each owner
shall be presumed to exercise the right and option to pay the amount due in
equal annual installments bearing interest at the rate specified in the notice
and extending over the period of years, not exceeding 20 specified in the
notice.
(b)  The first installment shall become due one year from the date when
interest commenced, and one installment shall become due on the same day of
the same month annually thereafter.
(c)  Any assessment may be prepaid on any annual installment date without
interest penalty provided the total balance of the assessment, including
accrued interest, costs and penalties, be paid.
